src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Noun inflection

!! Nouns in ERZYA inflect for number, case and declension (definite, indefinite and possessive).

!Problems
!LEXICON N-COLL_
!+Coll+Pl+Nom+Indef: #;
!LEXICON N-COM_
!+SP+Com+Indef: #;


!! !!KINSHIP 

!LEXICON N-KIN_KAL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_KEL1
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_PEJ
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;
! N-KIN ;

LEXICON N-KIN_LAK
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;
 N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_KIT
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_OSH
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OSH ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_KLASS
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_PANGO
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_TINGE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TINGE ;
! N-KIN ;
!LEXICON N-KIN_VELE_IS-KE-DIM
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin+Der/ke+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@ N-KIN_VELE ;
LEXICON N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е N-KIN_VELE ;
LEXICON N-KIN_VELE
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
 N-KIN ;
!LEXICON N-KIN_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin+Der/Dimin+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@ N-KIN_PIZE2 ;
!LEXICON N-KIN_PIZE2
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
! N-KIN ;

LEXICON N-KIN_KUDO
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
 N-KIN ;


!! !!HUMAN 

LEXICON N-HUM_KAL
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_TYL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON N-HUM_KEL1
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_PEJ
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;

LEXICON N-HUM_LAK
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;

LEXICON N-HUM_LAV
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;

LEXICON N-HUM_TEV
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TEV ;

LEXICON N-HUM_KIT
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;

LEXICON N-HUM_OZKS
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OZKS ;

LEXICON N-HUM_LEVKS
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON N-HUM_ROZ1
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON N-HUM_OSH
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@%{back%} NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_KENKSH
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_KLASS
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_PANGO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_TINGE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TINGE ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_TESHTE
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_VELE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!LEXICON N-HUM_PIZE2
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N-HUM_KUDO
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;

!! !!PLACE 
!LEXICON N_KAL_PLC
!N-PLC_KAL ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KAL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_KEL1
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_TYL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_KAL ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_LAK_PLC
!N-PLC_LAK ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_LAK
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_LAV
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_TEV
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TEV ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KIT_PLC
!N-PLC_KIT ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KIT
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_OZKS
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OZKS ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_OSH_PLC
!N-PLC_OSH ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_OSH
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
!€# ошов +Sem/Plc+SP+Lat+Indef: 
!€# ош%>%{оеэØ%}в
!€0 ош0ов

!LEXICON N_KLASS_PLC
!N-PLC_KLASS ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KLASS
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_CHUVTO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_CHUVTO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_KARDAZ
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KARDAZ ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_PANGO_PLC
!N-PLC_PANGO ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_PANGO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_TINGE_PLC
!N-PLC_TINGE ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_TINGE
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TINGE ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KI_PLC
!N-PLC_KI ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KI
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KI ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_VELE_PLC
!N-PLC_VELE ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_VELE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_PIZE2_PLC
!N-PLC_PIZE2 ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_PIZE2
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KUDO_PLC
!N-PLC_KUDO ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KUDO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!! !!LATIVE 
!LEXICON N_KAL-LAT
! N_KAL ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KEL1-LAT
! N_KEL1 ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_LAK-LAT
! N_LAK ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KIT-LAT
! N_KIT ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_OSH-LAT_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_OSH-LAT ;
!LEXICON N_OSH-LAT
! N_OSH ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KLASS-LAT
! N_KLASS ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_PANGO-LAT
! N_PANGO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_TINGE-LAT
! N_TINGE ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KI-LAT
! N_KI ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KENKSH-LAT
! N_KENKSH ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@%{frontHard%} LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_OZKS-LAT
! N_OZKS ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@%{backHard%} LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_VELE-LAT
! N_VELE ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
!LEXICON N_PIZE2-LAT
! N_PIZE2 ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
!LEXICON N_KUDO-LAT
! N_KUDO ;
!@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!! !!VOCATIVE
LEXICON N_READY-VOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;
LEXICON N_KAJ_HUMVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum+Der+Der/kaj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_AJ_HUMVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum+Der+Der/aj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

!LEXICON N_HUMVOC
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_KAJ_KINVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin+Der+Der/kaj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_AJ_KINVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin+Der+Der/aj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

!LEXICON N_KINVOC
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

!! !!NAMES OF MONTHS
!LEXICON N-MONTHS_KAL_SUB
!+Sem/Mnth+Use/NG+Err/Orth: NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON N-MONTHS_LAV
!+Sem/Mnth: NMN_LAV ;

!! !!COMMON NOUNS 

LEXICON N_KAL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_LAV
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_TEV
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
