src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
ававткине:ававткине N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ававтыне:ававтыне N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
авакуда:ава#куда N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
авкине:авкине N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
азербайджанец:азербайджанец N-HUM_OSH  "azeri" ;
аквалангист:аквалангист N-HUM_KIT  "" ;
альне:альне N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "aviomiehen (nuorempi) veli" ;
аляй:аляй N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
антагонист:антагонист N-HUM_KIT  "" ;
атявтке:атявтке N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
аштитейтерь:аштитейтерь N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
бабай:бабай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
баталист:баталист N-HUM_KIT  "" ;
бельгиец:бельгиец N-HUM_OSH  "belgialainen" ;
библиограф:библиограф N_KAL  "" ;
бодяй:бодяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
ботаник:ботаник N-HUM_LAK  "kasvitieteilijä" ;
вадринекай:вадринекай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
ванынекай:ванынекай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
варданка:варданка N-HUM_KUDO  "orjatar" ;
васолбаба:васол#баба N-KIN_KUDO  "äidinäiti" ;
васолбодя:васолбодя N-KIN_KUDO  "äidinisä" ;
вастакай:вастакай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
вежавай:вежавай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
венчакай:венчакай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "morsian" ;
вечкабаба:вечка#баба N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
вечкадеда:вечка#деда N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
военнослужащей:военнослужащей N_KAL  "" ;
геолог:геолог N-HUM_KAL  "geologi" ;
гестаповец:гестаповец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
гуманист:гуманист N-HUM_KIT  "" ;
датчанава:датчан#ава N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
десятник:десятник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
диакон:диакон N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
директор:директор N_KAL  "johtaja" ;
дирякай:дирякай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
дугай:дугай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
дугакай:дугакай N_KAJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
землевладелец:землевладелец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
идемломань:идем#ломань N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
инебаба:ине#баба N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
ирландец:ирландец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
итог:итог N_KAL  "summa" ;
казачка:казачка N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
какай:какай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
каменщик:каменщик N-HUM_LAK  "muurari" ;
карикатурист:карикатурист N-HUM_KIT  "" ;
кенгелькай:кенгелькай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
килейчей:килей#чей N_KAL  "" ;
колдунломань:колдун#ломань N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
кореец:кореец N-HUM_OSH  "korealainen" ;
корьмай:корьмай N_AJ_KINVOC  "elättäjä" ;
крестник:кресник N-KIN_LAK  "" ;
крестник:крестник N-KIN_LAK  "" ;
кудоугол:кудоугол N_KAL  "" ;
кума:кума N-KIN_KUDO  "kummi (kummitädin käyttämä sana)" ;
кумыкава:кумык#ава N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
леля:леля N-KIN_KUDO  "isoveli" ;
лелякай:лелякай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
ломаломань:лома#ломань N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
любовник:любовник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
мамай:мамай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
мариец:мариец N-HUM_OSH  "mari" ;
милитарист:милитарист N-HUM_KIT  "militaristi" ;
налксиялга:налксиялга N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
невролог:невролог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
нилеугол:нилеугол N_KAL  "" ;
нумолкай:нумолкай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
оинекай:оинекай N_KAJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
олимпиец:олимпиец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
офтальмолог:офтальмолог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
патькай:патькай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
пенерьвакай:пенерьвакай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
пессимист:пессимист N-HUM_KIT  "pessimisti" ;
подкулачник:подкулачник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
покштя:покштя N-KIN_KUDO  "isoisä" ;
покштяй:покштяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
попай:попай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
потков:потков N_KAL  "" ;
приёмщик:приёмщик N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
прявтке:прявтке N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
рабовладелец:рабовладелец N-HUM_OSH  "orjanomistaja" ;
сварщик:сварщик N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
сваткай:сваткай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
семитолог:семитолог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
социалист:социалист N-HUM_KIT  "sosialisti" ;
сплав:сплав N_KAL  "" ;
стольначальник:стольначальник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
тейтерьге:тейтерьге N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
тейтерьэйкакш:тейтерь#эйкакш N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
тетя:тетя N-KIN_KUDO  "isä" ;
тетяй:тетяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
тетякай:тетякай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
украинка:украинка N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
урьвинекай:урьвинекай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
учёник:учёник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
фармаколог:фармаколог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
фаталист:фаталист N-HUM_KIT  "" ;
хлор:хлор N_KAL  "kloori" ;
цыганава:цыган#ава N-HUM_KUDO  "mustalaisnainen" ;
чаулай:чаулай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
чаулкай:чаулкай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
шичеаля:шичеаля N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
шкинекай:шкинекай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
штукатур:штукатур N-HUM_KAL  "rappaaja" ;
эгоист:эгоист N-HUM_KIT  "egoisti" ;
эйдяй:эйдяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
экскаваторщик:экскаваторщик N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
